Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1403
Roads on county or township line; deviation from line.

Any public road that is or shall hereafter be laid out on a county or township line shall be held to be a road on a county or township line, although, owing to the topography of the ground along the county or township line, or at the crossing of any stream of water, the proper authorities, in establishing or locating such road, may have located a portion of the same to one side of such county or township line.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. I, § 3, p. 509.